Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2042.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "athletic activity" in section 2 of the act of November 9, 2011 (P.L.411, No.101), known as the Safety in Youth Sports Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Athletic activity." All of the following:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) Interscholastic athletics.(2) An athletic contest or competition, other than interscholastic athletics, that is sponsored by or associated with a school entity, including cheerleading, club-sponsored sports activities and sports activities sponsored by school-affiliated organizations.(3) Noncompetitive cheerleading that is sponsored by or associated with a school entity.(3.1) An official recreational athletic event.(4) Practices, interschool practices and scrimmages for all of the activities listed under paragraphs (1), (2) [and], (3) and (3.1).* * *"Official recreational athletic event." A recreational athletic contest or competition that meets all of the following:(1) Involves pre-adult participants.(2) Is sponsored by or associated with a sponsoring organization.(3) Requires pre-adult participant registration, maintains written rules of play and conducts regular season or tournament style competition.(4) Is not an athletic activity associated with a school entity or sponsored by interscholastic activities.(5) Is not an incidental athletic competition or contest."Pre-adult participant." An individual , other than a student, under 18 years of age that participates in an athletic activity."Return-to-learn." A program developed by the Department of Health , IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, to 20250HB2042PN3205 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 build a bridge connecting the medical, rehabilitation, education sectors and families following a student's or pre-adult participant's brain injury. The term includes the BrainSTEPS program or a successor program.* * *"Sponsoring organization." A person or organization that is involved in sponsoring, organizing, scheduling or conducting games, exhibitions, events or contests for an official recreational athletic event.Section 2. Section 3(a), (b), (c), (d), (e) and (g) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read: ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:Section 3. Concussions and traumatic brain injuries.(a) Educational materials.--The Department of Health and the Department of Education shall develop and post on their Internet websites guidelines and other relevant materials to inform and educate students and pre-adult participants participating in or desiring to participate in an athletic activity, their parents and their coaches about the nature and risk of concussion and traumatic brain injury, including the risks associated with continuing to play or practice after a concussion or traumatic brain injury. In developing the guidelines and materials, the departments shall utilize existing materials developed or approved by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH OR OTHER NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED BRAIN INJURY ORGANIZATIONS. [A student participating in or desiring] A student or pre-adult participant who participates or desires to participate in an athletic activity and the student's or pre- adult participant's parent or guardian shall each [school] year, 20250HB2042PN3205 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prior to participation [by the student] in an athletic activity, sign and return to the student's school entity or pre-adult participant's sponsoring organization an acknowledgment of receipt and review of a concussion and traumatic brain injury information sheet developed under this subsection.(b) Informational meeting.--A school entity or sponsoring organization SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G.1) may hold an informational meeting prior to the start of each athletic season for students or pre-adult participants and competitors of all ages [of competitors] regarding concussions and other head injuries, the importance of proper concussion management and how preseason baseline assessments can aid in the evaluation, management and recovery process. In addition to students, pre-adult participants, parents, coaches and other school officials, informational meetings may include physicians, neuropsychologists, athletic trainers and physical therapists.(c) Removal from play.--A student or pre-adult participant who, as determined by a game official, coach from the student's or pre-adult participant's team, [certified] LICENSED athletic trainer, licensed physician, licensed physical therapist or other official designated by the student's school entity or pre-adult participant's sponsoring organization , exhibits signs or symptoms of a concussion or traumatic brain injury while participating in an athletic activity shall be removed by the coach from participation at that time.(d) Return to play.--The coach shall not return a student or pre-adult participant to participation until the student or pre-adult participant is evaluated and cleared for return to participation in writing by an appropriate medical professional. The governing body of a school entity or a sponsoring 20250HB2042PN3205 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization may designate a specific person or persons, who must be appropriate medical professionals, to provide written clearance for return to participation. In order to help determine whether a student or pre-adult participant is ready to return to participation, an appropriate medical professional may consult any other licensed or certified medical professionals.(d.1) Information to be distributed .--A school entity or sponsoring organization must distribute return-to-learn information ADOPT A CONCUSSION RETURN-TO-LEARN PROTOCOL, AS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, to all students and pre- adult participants before the student or pre-adult participant participates in an athletic activity offered by the school entity or sponsoring organization. (e) Training course.--Once each school year, a coach shall complete the concussion management certification training course [offered] approved by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the National Federation of State High School Associations or another provider approved by the Department of Health. A coach shall not coach an athletic activity until the coach completes the training course required under this subsection.* * *[(g) Other youth athletic activities.--The sponsors of youth athletic activities not specifically addressed by this act are encouraged to follow the guidance set forth in this act.](G.1) NOTICE.--A COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY OR MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY THAT OWNS OR LEASES A PLAYING FIELD OR RECREATIONAL FACILITY USED BY A SPONSORING ORGANIZATION SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY CONDITION OR REQUIRE ANY CONTRACT, AGREEMENT OR MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING TO USE THE FIELD OR FACILITY ON THE SPONSORING 20250HB2042PN3205 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ORGANIZATION'S COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION. A COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY OR MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY MAY ALSO REQUIRE THE SPONSORING ORGANIZATION TO HOLD THE INFORMATIONAL MEETING UNDER SUBSECTION (B) AS A CONDITION OR REQUIREMENT OF A CONTRACT, AGREEMENT OR MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING TO USE THE FIELD OR FACILITY.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2042PN3205 - 6 - 12345678